Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-421
Bond issue; duties of treasurer; filing and recording.

The treasurer shall at the time of signing the bonds, and before the issue thereof, make a statement in writing and under oath of the same, giving the date, amount, maturity, rate of interest, and place of payment. Such statement shall be filed and recorded in the office of the county clerk.

Laws 1907, c. 153, § 15, p. 481;

Laws 1911, c. 145, § 1, p. 485;

R.S.1913, § 1885;

C.S.1922, § 1833;

C.S.1929, § 31-521;

R.S.1943, § 31-421;

Laws 1969, c. 245, § 9, p. 901.

Noncompliance with above section is an irregularity not affecting jurisdiction. Scottsbluff Drainage District v. Scotts Bluff County, 113 Neb. 187, 202 N.W. 455 (1925).